Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1021.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 72. At Before January 1, 2027, at its fall state convention, each political party may nominate a candidate for each of the offices of lieutenant governor, secretary of state, and attorney general. Beginning January 1, 2027, at its fall state convention, each political party may nominate a candidate for the office of lieutenant governor. Sec. 72a. Beginning January 1, 2027, a general primary election must be held in every election precinct in this state on the Tuesday after the first Monday in August before every general November election in which a secretary of state and an attorney general are to be elected. Beginning January 1, 2027, at the general primary election, the qualified and registered electors of each political party may vote for party candidates for the offices of secretary of state and attorney general. This section does not apply to political parties required to nominate candidates at caucuses or conventions as provided in section 532. Sec. 73. Not Before January 1, 2027, not more than 24 hours after the conclusion of the fall state convention, the state central committee of each political party shall canvass the proceedings of the convention and determine the nominees of the convention for the offices of lieutenant governor, secretary of state, and attorney general. Beginning January 1, 2027, not more than 24 hours after the conclusion of the fall state convention, the state central committee of each political party shall canvass the proceedings of the convention and determine the nominee of the convention for the office of lieutenant governor. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of the convention, the chairperson and secretary of the state central committee shall forward to the secretary of state a typewritten or printed list of document with the name or names and residence, including the street address if known, of the candidate or candidates nominated at the state convention. The secretary of state shall forward a copy of a list the document received under this section to the board of election commissioners of each county, in care of the county clerk at the county seat. Sec. 73a. Beginning January 1, 2027, to obtain the printing of the name of an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of secretary of state or attorney general under a particular political party heading on the official primary ballots, there must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing in this state as determined under section 544f. Nominating petitions must be signed by at least 100 registered resident electors in each of at least 1/2 of the congressional districts of this state. Nominating petitions must be in the form prescribed in section 544c. Beginning January 1, 2027, nominating petitions must be received by the secretary of state for filing in accordance with this act up to 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August primary election. Sec. 74. A person Before January 1, 2027, an individual who has been certified by the state central committee of any political party as nominated for the office of lieutenant governor, secretary of state, or attorney general may withdraw by filing a written notice of withdrawal with the secretary of state or his or her the secretary of state's authorized agent and a copy with the chairperson and the secretary of the state central committee of the political party not later than 4 p.m. , eastern standard time, of the fourth business day following the conclusion of the convention at which the person individual was nominated. Beginning January 1, 2027, an individual who has been certified by the state central committee of any political party as nominated for the office of lieutenant governor may withdraw by filing a written notice of withdrawal with the secretary of state or the secretary of state's authorized agent and a copy with the chairperson and the secretary of the state central committee of the political party not later than 4 p.m. of the fourth business day following the conclusion of the convention at which the individual was nominated. Sec. 74a. Beginning January 1, 2027, after the filing of a nominating petition by or on behalf of a proposed candidate for secretary of state or attorney general, the candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless a written notice of withdrawal is served on the secretary of state not later than 4 p.m. of the third day after the last day for filing nominating petitions. Sec. 74b. Beginning January 1, 2027, if for any reason there is no candidate of a political party for the office of attorney general or secretary of state, a blank space must be provided on each of the official primary ballots that affords every elector of the political party an opportunity to vote for a candidate for the office of secretary of state or attorney general by writing in the name of the elector's selection. Sec. 74c. Beginning January 1, 2027, if a candidate for a political party for the office of secretary of state or attorney general, after having qualified as a candidate, dies after the time specified for filing nominating petitions under section 73a, leaving the political party without a candidate for the office of secretary of state or attorney general, a candidate to fill the vacancy may be selected by the state central committee of the political party, and the name of the candidate selected must be transmitted to the county officers who are required by law to print and distribute the primary ballots. Beginning January 1, 2027, the name of the candidate must be printed on the primary ballots, but if the primary ballots have been printed, the county officers shall have the primary ballots reprinted with the candidate's name on the primary ballots and the reprinted primary ballots must be distributed to the various voting precincts in the county officers' respective counties. Sec. 74d. Beginning January 1, 2027, the candidate of each political party for the office of secretary of state receiving the greatest number of votes cast for the office of secretary of state, as provided in the report of the board of state canvassers based on the returns from the various boards of county canvassers, or as determined by the board of state canvassers as the result of a recount, must be declared the nominee of that political party for the office of secretary of state at the next general November election. The board of state canvassers shall immediately certify the nominations to the secretary of state. Sec. 74e. Beginning January 1, 2027, the candidate of each political party for the office of attorney general receiving the greatest number of votes cast for the office of attorney general, as provided in the report of the board of state canvassers based on the returns from the various boards of county canvassers, or as determined by the board of state canvassers as the result of a recount, must be declared the nominee of that political party for the office of attorney general at the next general November election. The board of state canvassers shall immediately certify the nominations to the secretary of state. Sec. 74f. Beginning January 1, 2027, if a candidate of a political party for the office of secretary of state or attorney general files a nominating petition for that office and has been nominated for the office of secretary of state or attorney general by the political party, the candidate is not permitted to withdraw unless the candidate moves from this state or becomes physically unfit. This section does not prohibit the withdrawal of a candidate who was nominated without having filed a nominating petition and whose name has been written or placed on the ballot of a political party. Sec. 281. A person An individual is not eligible to membership on the state board of education , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University, or the board of governors of Wayne State University if the person individual is not a registered and qualified elector of this state on the date the person individual is nominated for the office. Sec. 283. Not more than 24 hours after the conclusion of the fall state convention, the state central committee of each political party shall canvass the proceedings of the convention and determine the nominees of the convention for membership on the state board of education. , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University, and the board of governors of Wayne State University. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of the state convention, the chairperson and secretary of the state central committee shall forward to the secretary of state a typewritten or printed list of the names and residence, including the street address if known, of the candidates nominated at the convention for the offices specified in this section. state board of education. The secretary of state shall forward a copy of a list received under this section to the board of election commissioners of each county, in care of the county clerk at the county seat. Sec. 284. A person An individual who is certified by the state central committee of a political party as nominated for membership on the state board of education , the board of regents of the university of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan state university, or the board of governors of Wayne state university may withdraw by filing a written notice of withdrawal with the secretary of state or his or her the secretary of state's duly authorized agent and a copy with the chairperson and the secretary of the state central committee of the political party not later than 4 p.m. , eastern standard time, of the fourth business day following the conclusion of the convention at which the person individual was nominated. Sec. 285. Whenever If a candidate of a political party, after having been nominated to membership on the state board of education, the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University, or the board of governors of Wayne State University, shall die, withdraw, remove dies, withdraws, moves from the this state, or become becomes disqualified for any reason, the state central committee of said the political party shall meet forthwith and, by a majority vote of the members thereof, of the state central committee, shall select a candidate to fill the vacancy. thereby caused. The name of the candidate so selected shall must be immediately certified by the chairman chairperson and the secretary of said the committee to the secretary of state and to the board of election commissioners for each county , whose duty it is to prepare the official ballots. , and said The board shall cause to be printed or placed upon said on the ballots, in the proper place, the name of the candidate so selected to fill the vacancy. Sec. 287. The board of state canvassers shall determine which candidates for membership on the state board of education , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University and the board of governors of Wayne State University have received the greatest number of votes and shall declare such those candidates to be duly elected. The said board of state canvassers shall forthwith make and subscribe on its statement of returns a certificate of such determination and deliver the same to the secretary of state. Sec. 288. The secretary of state shall file in his the secretary of state's office and preserve the original statement and determination of the board of state canvassers of the result of the election and shall forthwith execute and cause to be delivered to the persons thereby individuals declared to be elected to membership on the state board of education , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University and the board of governors of Wayne State University a certificate of election, certified by him the secretary of state under the great seal of the this state. Sec. 289. Subject to section 286a, the term of office of members of the state board of education , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University, and the board of governors of Wayne State University shall be is 8 years and shall begin begins at 12 noon on January 1 next following their the election. The terms of office of members of said boards shall the state board of education continue until a successor is elected and qualified. Sec. 290. Every person Each individual elected to membership on the state board of education, the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University, or the board of governors of Wayne State University, before entering upon the duties of his the office, shall take and subscribe to the oath as provided in section 1 of article 11 XI of the state constitution of 1963, and shall deposit said the oath with the secretary of state. Sec. 291. Any person duly An individual elected to membership on the state board of education , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University or the board of governors of Wayne State University, who desires to resign shall file a written notice containing the effective date of such the resignation with the governor and a copy with the secretary of state. Sec. 292. (1) There shall be a A vacancy occurs on the state board of education , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University, or the board of governors of Wayne State University upon the happening of any of the following events: Death of the incumbent; his (a) The incumbent's death. (b) The incumbent's resignation. ; his (c) The incumbent's removal from office for cause. ; his (d) The incumbent's ceasing to be a resident of the this state. ; his (e) The incumbent's conviction of an infamous crime, or an offense involving the violation of his the incumbent's oath of office. ; the (f) The decision of a competent tribunal declaring his the incumbent's election or appointment void. ; or his (g) The incumbent's neglect or refusal to take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and deposit the same oath in the manner and within the time prescribed by law. (2) When If a vacancy shall occur occurs on any of the said boards, state board of education, a notice of such the vacancy and the reason why the same vacancy exists shall, must, within 10 days after such the vacancy occurs, be given in writing by the secretary of state to the governor. Such notice shall be given by the secretary of state. Sec. 293. Any member of said boards the state board of education may be removed from office upon conviction in impeachment proceedings for the reasons and in the manner set forth in section 7 of article 11 XI of the state constitution of 1963. The governor shall have has the power and it shall be his is the governor's duty , except at such time as the legislature may be in session, to examine into the condition and administration of the said boards state board of education and the acts of the members enumerated herein of the board and to remove from office for gross neglect of duty or for corrupt conduct in office, or any other misfeasance or malfeasance therein, in office, and report the causes of such the removal to the legislature. at its next session. Such person shall The individual must be served with a written notice of the charges against him the individual and be afforded an opportunity for a public hearing conducted personally by the governor. Sec. 294. Whenever If a vacancy shall occur occurs on the state board of education, the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University, or the board of governors of Wayne State University, the governor shall appoint a successor to fill such the vacancy. , and the person so The individual appointed shall take the oath of office and shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term and until his a successor is elected and qualified. A candidate receiving the highest number of votes for membership on any of said boards the state board of education and who has subscribed to the constitutional oath shall be deemed is considered to be elected and qualified even though a vacancy occurs prior to before the time he shall have the candidate has entered upon the duties of his the office. Sec. 295. The votes cast for any candidate for membership on the state board of education , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University and the board of governors of Wayne State University at any election shall be are subject to recount as provided in chapter 33 of this act.XXXIII. Sec. 296. Any person An individual elected to membership on the state board of education , the board of regents of the University of Michigan, the board of trustees of Michigan State University, or the board of governors of Wayne State University shall be is subject to recall as provided in chapter 36 of this act.XXXVI. Sec. 534. A general primary of all political parties except as provided in sections 532 and 685 must be held in every election precinct in this state on the Tuesday after the first Monday in August before every general November election, at which time the qualified and registered voters electors of each political party may vote for party candidates for the office of governor, United States Senator, Representative in Congress, state senator, representative in the legislature, county executive, prosecuting attorney, sheriff, county clerk, county treasurer, register of deeds, drain commissioner, public works commissioner, county road commissioner, county mine inspector, surveyor, and candidates for office in townships, and, beginning January 1, 2027, candidates for the office of secretary of state and the office of attorney general. A nomination for an office must be made only if the official is to be elected at the next succeeding general November election. Sec. 590a. (1) The form, size, and contents of a qualifying petition shall must be prescribed by the secretary of state and in substantially the same form as provided in section 590h. (2) A qualifying petition for the office of president President of the United States, United States senator, representative Senator, Representative in Congress, governor, secretary of state, attorney general, state senator, state representative, state board of education, board of regents of the university of Michigan, board of trustees of Michigan state university, board of governors of Wayne state university, or justice of the supreme court may be circulated on a countywide basis. The form of a qualifying petition that is circulated countywide shall must be prescribed by the secretary of state and in substantially the same form as provided in section 590h. Sec. 590b. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) and subject to the requirements prescribed in subsections (3) and (4), a qualifying petition for an office shall must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors of the district that is represented by the office being sought by the candidate equal to not less than 2% of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor in the district at the last election in which a governor was elected. In any case, at least 15 signatures shall be submitted.as determined under section 544f. (2) Subject to the requirements of subsections (3) and (4), if a qualifying petition is for a statewide elective office, the qualifying petition shall must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors of this state equal to not less than 1% of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor at the last election in which a governor was elected.as determined under section 544f. (3) All signatures on a qualifying petition shall must be obtained not more than 180 days immediately before the date of filing under section 590c. (4) As part of the minimum number of required signatures under this section, a qualifying petition for the office of president President of the United States, United States senator, Senator, governor, attorney general, secretary of state, state board of education, board of regents of the university of Michigan, board of trustees of Michigan state university, board of governors of Wayne state university, or justice of the supreme court shall must be signed by at least 100 registered electors in each of at least 1/2 of the congressional districts of the this state. Sec. 643. At the general election, the following officers shall must be elected when required by law: (a) Presidential electors. (b) In the state at large, a governor and a lieutenant governor, a secretary of state, and an attorney general. (c) A United States Senator. (d) In each congressional district, a Representative in Congress. (e) In each state senatorial district, a state senator. (f) In each state representative district, a representative in the state legislature. (g) Justices of the supreme court. (h) Two members of the state board of education. (i) Two regents of the University of Michigan. (j) Two trustees of Michigan State University. (k) Two governors of Wayne State University. (i) (l) In each county or district, judges of the court of appeals, a judge or judges of the circuit court, a judge or judges of probate, a judge or judges of the district court, a prosecuting attorney, a sheriff, a treasurer, a mine inspector, a county road commissioner, a drain commissioner, a surveyor, and, subject to section 200, a clerk and a register of deeds or a clerk register. (j) (m) Township officers. (k) (n) Any other officers required by law to be elected at that election. Sec. 697. At the general November election, the names of the several offices to be voted for must be placed on the ballot substantially in the following order in the years in which elections for those offices are held: Electors of President and Vice President of the United States; governor and lieutenant governor; secretary of state; attorney general; United States Senator; Representative in Congress; senator and representative in the state legislature; members of the state board of education; regents of the University of Michigan; trustees of Michigan State University; governors of Wayne State University; county executive; prosecuting attorney; sheriff; clerk; treasurer; register of deeds; mine inspector in counties electing a mine inspector; county road commissioners; drain commissioners; coroners; and surveyor. The following township officers must be placed on the same ballot as above described in substantially the following order in the year in which elections for those offices are held: supervisor, clerk, treasurer, trustees, and constables. Sec. 828. The clerk of the board of county canvassers forthwith, and in no case later than 24 hours after the completion of the canvass, on forms provided by the secretary of state, shall deliver in person or send to the secretary of state, by registered or certified mail with return receipt demanded, a certified copy of each of the statements prepared by the board as required by section 824, so far as the statements shall relate to the vote for any state office, electors of President and Vice President of the United States, United States Senator, Representative in Congress, supreme court justices, court of appeals judges, circuit court judges, probate judges, district court judges, state senators and representatives in the state legislature, members of the state board of education, members of the board of regents of the University of Michigan, members of the board of trustees of Michigan State University, members of the board of governors of Wayne State University, and any proposed amendment to the constitution or other question or proposition submitted at the election to the electors of this state at large, together with a certificate of authenticity signed by the clerk and the chairperson of the board of canvassers. Enacting section 1. Sections 282 and 286 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.282 and 168.286, are repealed. Enacting section 2. 1963 (2nd Ex Sess) PA 23, MCL 390.691 to 390.693, is repealed. Enacting section 3. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution J of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.